tools/spellcheckers/test/desktopspeller-gt-norm-yamls/derivation-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Derivation tests - Der/eamoš+Der/meahttun:
    garuhit+Ex/V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der4+Der/eamoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#soahpat+Ex/V+TV+Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Comp+Dial/-KJ+v1+Pl+Ill: garuheamoš#soahpameahttuseappuide
    garuhit+Ex/V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der4+Der/eamoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#soahpat+Ex/V+TV+Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Comp+Dial/-GG+v2+Pl+Ill: garuheamoš#soahpameahttusabbuide

  Derivation tests - Der/upmi+Der/Dimin:
    muitalit+Ex/V+Ex/TV+Gram/3syll+Der3+Der/PassL+Ex/V+IV+Der4+Der/upmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#bossu+Ex/N+G3+Sem/Ani+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: muitalupme#bossoš

  Derivation tests - Der/muš+Der/vuohta:
    gáidat+Ex/V+TV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#suhteš+Ex/A+Sem/Hum+Der3+Der/vuota+N+Ess: gáidamuš#suhteš#vuohtan

  Derivation tests - Der/vuohta + Der/Dimin:
    goađeheapme+Ex/A+Sem/Hum+Ex/Attr+Der3+Der/vuota+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#biila+Ex/N+Sem/Veh+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: goađehis#vuođa#biillažii

  Derivation tests - Der/NomAg+Der/las:
    buollit+Ex/V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#čierrut+Ex/V+TV+Der1+Der2+Der/las+A+Sg+Nom: buolli#čirrolas
    buollit+Ex/V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#čierrut+Ex/V+TV+Der1+Der2+Der/las+A+Sg+Nom: buolli#čirrolas
    buollit+Ex/V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#čierrut+Ex/V+TV+Der1+Der2+Der/las+A+Sg+Nom: [bulliid#čirrolas, buolliid#čirrolas]

  Derivation tests - Der/NomAct+Der/laš:
    ribahit+Ex/V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#riika+Ex/N+Sem/Org+Der1+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: ribahan#riikkalažžii

  Derivation tests - Prop derivations:
    Jiellevárri+Ex/N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der2+Der/t+A+Pl+Nom: [jielle#várigat, jielle#várihat]
    Skánit+Ex/N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/lasj+A+Attr: skánit#laš
